Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.027, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Sale or possession of kratom. (a) A person who unlawfully sells any amount of kratom or a substance that contains mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine to a person under the age of deleted text begin 18deleted text end new text begin 21new text end is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. (b) A person under the age of deleted text begin 18deleted text end new text begin 21new text end who unlawfully possesses any amount of kratom or a substance that contains mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end